Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 14. ELECTION CONTESTS

SUBTITLE C. CONTESTS IN OTHER TRIBUNALS

CHAPTER 242. CONTEST FOR CONSTITUTIONAL EXECUTIVE OFFICE

Sec. 242.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies to a contest of a general election for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, comptroller of public accounts, land commissioner, or attorney general.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 6.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 242.002. CONDUCT OF CONTEST GENERALLY. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the applicable provisions of Chapter 241 govern an election contest under this chapter.

(b) Two copies of the petition and answer must be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary shall deliver one copy of each document to the presiding officer of each house of the legislature. Security for costs must be filed with the chief clerk of the house of representatives. Any cost bond must be payable to both houses.

(c) The presiding officers of the two houses of the legislature shall act jointly in appointing a master of discovery and in setting the amount of and approving the sureties on a cost bond. The master may be a member of either house.

(d) The presiding officers shall refer the contest to a committee constituted in accordance with joint rules of the two legislative houses. Unless otherwise provided by joint rule, the referral is not effective until both presiding officers make the referral.

(e) The committee shall make its report to both houses of the legislature, and the two houses shall consider the report and dispose of the contest in joint session.

(f) Any legislative rules applicable to a contest under this chapter must be joint rules.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 242.003. CONTEST FOR OFFICE OF GOVERNOR OR LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR. (a) This section applies only to a contest for the office of governor or lieutenant governor.

(b) For purposes of a contest under this section, the date the official result of the contested election is determined is the date the governor completes the state canvass. The official result is determined from the tabulation of the election returns prepared by the secretary of state, except as provided by Subsection (d).

(c) The secretary of state shall deliver a certified copy of the tabulation to each of the presiding officers.

(d) The committee to which the contest is referred may treat the tabulation as correct until the speaker of the house of representatives opens and publishes the official election returns. If a discrepancy exists between the tabulation and the speaker's official count that might be material to a determination of the contest, the committee shall investigate the discrepancy to ascertain, if possible, the correct vote count.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 759, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 242.004. ACCELERATED ELECTION SCHEDULE. The time intervals for conducting a special election to fill a vacancy in the office of state senator or state representative occurring during a regular legislative session apply to any election necessary under the judgment in an election contest under this chapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.